hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Američki nogomet > Zaštitna oprema za američki nogomet > Dodaci za kacige za američki nogomet: Dijelovi za remen za bradu za američki nogomet; Vezice za bradu za američki nogomet; Maske za američki nogomet; Navlake za kacige za američki nogomet; Naljepnice za kacige za američki nogomet; Oprema i rezervni dijelovi za kacige za američki nogomet; Podstava za kacigu za američki nogomet; Metalni dijelovi za vizire za kacige za američki nogomet; Viziri za kacige za američki nogomet
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Американский футбол > Защитная экипировка для американского футбола > Аксессуары для шлемов для американского футбола: Фурнитура и детали подбородочных ремней для американского футбола; Подбородочные ремни для американского футбола; Защитные маски для американского футбола; Чехлы для шлемов для американского футбола; Наклейки для шлемов для американского футбола; Фурнитура и запасные части для шлемов для американского футбола; Накладки на шлемы для американского футбола; Фурнитура для визоров шлемов для американского футбола; Забрала для шлемов для американского футбола
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Amerikai futball > Amerikaifutball-védőfelszerelés > Amerikaifutball-sisakkiegészítők: Amerikaifutball-állvédőszíj-alkatrészek és -rögzítők; Amerikaifutball-állpántok; Amerikaifutball-arcmaszkok; Amerikai futball sisakhuzatok; Amerikai futball sisakmatricák; Amerikai futball sisak rögzítőelemek és cserealkatrészek; Amerikaifutball-sisakpárnázás; Amerikaifutball-sisakrostély-rögzítők; Amerikaifutball-sisakvédők
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Αμερικανικό ποδόσφαιρο > Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου > Αξεσουάρ κράνους αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου: Εξαρτήματα & ανταλλακτικά για υποσιάγωνα αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Ιμάντες πηγουνιού αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Μάσκες προσώπου αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Καλύμματα κράνους αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Αυτοκόλλητα κράνους αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Υλικός εξοπλισμός και ανταλλακτικά κράνους αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Επένδυση κράνους αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Εξαρτήματα προσωπίδας κράνους αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Γείσα κράνους αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 美式橄榄球 > 美式橄榄球护具 > 美式橄榄球头盔配件: 美式橄榄球下巴带五金件和零件; 美式橄榄球下颌带; 美式橄榄球面罩; 美式橄榄球头盔套; 美式橄榄球头盔贴花; 美式橄榄球头盔五金件与替换零件; 美式橄榄球头盔内垫; 美式橄榄球头盔护目镜五金件; 美式橄榄球头盔观察窗
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 아메리칸 풋볼 > 미식축구 보호 장비 > 미식축구 헬멧 액세서리: 미식축구 턱끈 하드웨어 및 부품; 미식축구 턱끈; 미식축구 페이스 마스크; 미식축구 헬멧 커버; 미식축구 헬멧 데칼; 미식축구 헬멧 하드웨어 및 교체 부품; 미식축구 헬멧 패딩; 미식축구 헬멧 바이저 하드웨어; 미식축구 헬멧 바이저
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > アメリカンフットボール > アメリカンフットボール用プロテクター > アメリカンフットボール用ヘルメットアクセサリー: アメリカンフットボール用チンストラップ金具・パーツ; アメリカンフットボール用あごひも; アメリカンフットボール用フェイスマスク; アメリカンフットボール用ヘルメットカバー; アメリカンフットボール用ヘルメットデカール; アメリカンフットボール用ヘルメット金具・交換部品; アメリカンフットボール用ヘルメットパッド; アメリカンフットボール用ヘルメットバイザー金具; アメリカンフットボール用ヘルメットバイザー
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Amerikan Futbolu > Amerikan Futbolu Koruyucu Ekipman > Amerikan Futbolu Kask Aksesuarları: Amerikan futbolu çenelik donanımı ve parçaları; Amerikan Futbolu Kask Kayışları; Amerikan Futbolu Yüz Maskeleri; Amerikan futbolu kask kılıfları; Amerikan futbolu kask çıkartmaları; Amerikan futbolu kask donanımı ve yedek parçaları; Amerikan Futbolu Kask Dolguları; Amerikan futbolu kask vizörü donanımı; Amerikan Futbolu Kask Siperliği
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Amerikansk fotboll > Amerikansk fotboll skyddsutrustning > Amerikansk fotboll hjälmtillbehör: Beslag och delar till hakremmar för amerikansk fotboll; Amerikansk fotboll hakskydd; Amerikansk fotboll ansiktsmasker; Hjälmöverdrag för amerikansk fotboll; Hjälmdekaler för amerikansk fotboll; Fästen och reservdelar till hjälmar för amerikansk fotboll; Amerikansk fotboll hjälminlägg; Monteringsdetaljer för hjälmvisir till amerikansk fotboll; Amerikansk fotboll hjälmvisir
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Futbol amerykański > Ochraniacze do futbolu amerykańskiego > Akcesoria do kasków do futbolu amerykańskiego: Części i elementy mocujące do pasków podbródkowych do futbolu amerykańskiego; Ochraniacz na brodę do futbolu amerykańskiego; Maska ochronna do futbolu amerykańskiego; Pokrowce na kaski do futbolu amerykańskiego; Naklejki na kaski do futbolu amerykańskiego; Elementy montażowe i części zamienne do kasków do futbolu amerykańskiego; Wyściółka kasku do futbolu amerykańskiego; Elementy mocujące do wizjerów kasków do futbolu amerykańskiego; Osłony na kask do futbolu amerykańskiego (visors)
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Americký fotbal > Ochranná výstroj pro americký fotbal > Doplňky k helmě pro americký fotbal: Kování a díly pro podbradníky na americký fotbal; Pásky na bradu pro americký fotbal; Ochranné mřížky na obličej pro americký fotbal; Kryty na helmy na americký fotbal; Polepy na helmy na americký fotbal; Hardware a náhradní díly pro helmy na americký fotbal; Chrániče do helmy pro americký fotbal; Kování pro hledí helem na americký fotbal; Hledí helem pro americký fotbal
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Futebol americano > Equipamento de proteção para futebol americano > Acessórios para capacete de futebol americano: Ferragens e peças para jugular de futebol americano; Tiras para o queixo para futebol americano; Face masks para futebol americano; Capas para capacete de futebol americano; Adesivos para capacete de futebol americano; Peças de reposição e ferragens para capacete de futebol americano; Forro de capacete de futebol americano; Ferragens para viseira de capacete de futebol americano; Visores de capacete de futebol americano
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > American Football > Schutzbekleidung für American Football > Helmzubehör für American Football: Hardware & Ersatzteile für American-Football-Kinnriemen; Kinnbänder für American Football; Schutzmasken für American Football; American-Football-Helmüberzüge; American-Football-Helmaufkleber; Hardware & Ersatzteile für American-Football-Helme; Helmpolsterung für American Football; Hardware für American-Football-Helmvisiere; Helmvisiere für American Football
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Ameriški nogomet > Zaščitna oprema za ameriški nogomet > Dodatki za čelade za ameriški nogomet: Bradni trak za čelado za ameriški nogomet Nastavki in deli; Trakovi za brado za ameriški nogomet; Obrazne maske za ameriški nogomet; Čelada za ameriški nogomet Prevleke; Čelada za ameriški nogomet Nalepke; Čelade za ameriški nogomet, nastavki in nadomestni deli; Obloge za čelade za ameriški nogomet; Čelada za ameriški nogomet Oprema za vizir; Vizirji za čelade za ameriški nogomet
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 美式足球 > 美式足球護具 > 美式足球頭盔配件: 美式足球下巴帶五金與零件; 美式足球下巴帶; 美式足球面罩; 美式足球頭盔罩; 美式足球頭盔貼花; 美式足球頭盔五金與替換零件; 美式足球頭盔襯墊; 美式足球頭盔面罩五金配件; 美式足球頭盔面罩
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > American Football > American Football Protective Gear > American Football Helmet Accessories: American Football Chin Strap Hardware & Parts; American Football Chin Straps; American Football Face Masks; American Football Helmet Covers; American Football Helmet Decals; American Football Helmet Hardware & Replacement Parts; American Football Helmet Padding; American Football Helmet Visor Hardware; American Football Helmet Visors
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bóng bầu dục Mỹ > Đồ bảo hộ chơi bóng bầu dục Mỹ > Phụ kiện cho mũ bảo hiểm chơi bóng bầu dục Mỹ: Chi tiết kim loại và bộ phận dây quai hàm mũ bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Dây đai đeo cằm chơi bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Khung bảo vệ mặt chơi bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Vỏ bọc mũ bảo hiểm bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Đề-can dán mũ bảo hiểm bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Phụ tùng và phụ kiện thay thế cho mũ bảo hiểm bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Đệm mũ bảo hiểm chơi bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Chi tiết kim loại kính che mặt mũ bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Kính mũ bảo hiểm chơi bóng bầu dục Mỹ
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Fútbol americano > Equipo de protección de fútbol americano > Accesorios para cascos de fútbol americano: Herrajes y piezas para barbiquejos de fútbol americano; Mentoneras de fútbol americano; Máscaras para cascos de fútbol americano; Fundas para cascos de fútbol americano; Calcomanías para cascos de fútbol americano; Herrajes y piezas de repuesto para cascos de fútbol americano; Acolchado para cascos de fútbol americano; Herrajes para viseras de cascos de fútbol americano; Viseras para cascos de fútbol americano
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Americký futbal > Ochranné vybavenie pre americký futbal > Príslušenstvo k prilbám na americký futbal: Kovanie a súčiastky na podbradný remienok pre americký futbal; Chrániče brady pre americký futbal; Tvárové masky pre americký futbal; Obaly na prilby na americký futbal; Nálepky na prilby na americký futbal; Kovanie a náhradné diely pre prilby pre americký futbal; Výplň prilby na americký futbal; Materiál na priezory prilby na americký futbal; Priezory prilby na americký futbal
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Amerikkalainen jalkapallo > Suojavarusteet, amerikkalainen jalkapallo > Kypäräasusteet, amerikkalainen jalkapallo: Amerikkalaisen jalkapallon leukahihnojen kiinnikkeet ja osat; Leukahihnat, amerikkalainen jalkapallo; Kasvomaskit, amerikkalainen jalkapallo; Amerikkalaisen jalkapallon kypärän suojukset; Amerikkalaisen jalkapallon kypärätarrat; Amerikkalaisen jalkapallon kypärän kiinnikkeet ja varaosat; Kypärän pehmusteet, amerikkalainen jalkapallo; Amerikkalaisen jalkapallon kypärävisiirien kiinnikkeet; Kypärän visiirit, amerikkalainen jalkapallo
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > อเมริกันฟุตบอล > อุปกรณ์ป้องกันอเมริกันฟุตบอล > อุปกรณ์เสริมหมวกกันน็อคอเมริกันฟุตบอล: ฮาร์ดแวร์และชิ้นส่วนสายรัดคางสำหรับอเมริกันฟุตบอล; สายรัดคางอเมริกันฟุตบอล; หน้ากากอเมริกันฟุตบอล; ที่คลุมหมวกอเมริกันฟุตบอล; รูปลอกติดหมวกอเมริกันฟุตบอล; ฮาร์ดแวร์และอะไหล่หมวกอเมริกันฟุตบอล; แผ่นรองหมวกกันน็อคอเมริกันฟุตบอล; ฮาร์ดแวร์กะบังหน้าหมวกกันน็อกอเมริกันฟุตบอล; กะบังหมวกกันน็อคอเมริกันฟุตบอล
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Futebol Americano > Equipamento de Proteção de Futebol Americano > Acessórios de Capacete de Futebol Americano: Componentes e peças para correias de queixo de futebol americano; Protetores de Queixo de Futebol Americano; Máscaras Faciais de Futebol Americano; Capas para capacetes de futebol americano; Autocolantes para capacetes de futebol americano; Ferragens e peças de substituição para capacetes de futebol americano; Forro de Capacete de Futebol Americano; Equipamentos para viseiras de capacetes de futebol americano; Viseiras de Capacete de Futebol Americano
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Football américain > Équipements de protection pour le football américain > Accessoires pour casques de football américain: Matériel et pièces de mentonnières de football américain; Mentonnières pour le football américain; Masque de protection de football américain; Housses pour casques de football américain; Autocollants pour casques de football américain; Matériel et pièces de rechange pour casques de football américain; Rembourrage de casque pour le football américain; Matériel de visières de casques de football américain; Visière de casque pour le football américain
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Football americano > Attrezzatura protettiva da football americano > Accessori per caschi da football americano: Minuteria e componenti per sottogola da football americano; Mentoniere da football americano; Griglie da football americano; Copricaschi da football americano; Adesivi per caschi da football americano; Minuteria e pezzi di ricambio per caschi da football americano; Imbottiture per caschi da football americano; Minuteria per visiere dei caschi da football americano; Visori per caschi da football americano
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Amerikietiškasis futbolas > Amerikietiškojo futbolo apsauginės priemonės > Amerikietiškojo futbolo šalmų priedai: Amerikietiškojo futbolo smakro dirželio techninė įranga ir dalys; Amerikietiškojo futbolo smakro dirželiai; Amerikietiškojo futbolo veido kaukės; Amerikietiško futbolo šalmų uždangalai; Amerikietiško futbolo šalmų lipdukai; Amerikietiškojo futbolo šalmų tvirtinimo detalės ir atsarginės dalys; Amerikietiškojo futbolo šalmų paminkštinimai; Amerikietiškojo futbolo šalmo skydelio tvirtinimo detalės; Amerikietiškojo futbolo šalmų skydeliai
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > American Football > American Football beschermende uitrusting > American Football helmaccessoires: Hardware en onderdelen voor American football-kinbanden; American Football kinbanden; American Football gezichtsmaskers; Helmhoezen voor American football; Helmstickers voor American football; Hardware en reserveonderdelen voor American football-helmen; American Football helmpadding; Hardware voor vizieren van American football-helmen; American Football helmvizieren
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Amerikansk fotball > Beskyttelsesutstyr for amerikansk fotball > Hjelmtilbehør for amerikansk fotball: Deler og festemateriell til hakereim for amerikansk fotball; Hakestropper for amerikansk fotball; Ansiktsmasker for amerikansk fotball; Hjelmtrekk til amerikansk fotball; Hjelmdekaler til amerikansk fotball; Festemateriell og reservedeler til hjelm for amerikansk fotball; Hjelmpolstring for amerikansk fotball; Festemateriell til visir for amerikansk fotball; Hjelmvisirer for amerikansk fotball
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Amerikansk fodbold – bold > Amerikansk fodbold – beskyttelsesudstyr > Amerikansk fodbold – hjelmtilbehør: Beslag og dele til hageremme til amerikansk fodbold; Amerikansk fodbold – hageremme; Amerikansk fodbold – ansigtsmasker; Betræk til hjelme til amerikansk fodbold; Klistermærker til hjelme til amerikansk fodbold; Hardware og reservedele til hjelme til amerikansk fodbold; Amerikansk fodbold – hjelmpolstring; Beslag til hjelmvisirer til amerikansk fodbold; Amerikansk fodbold – visirer
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Американски футбол > Защитна екипировка за американски футбол > Аксесоари за каска за американски футбол: Крепежни елементи и части за подбрадници за каски за американски футбол; Подбрадници за американски футбол; Маски за лице за американски футбол; Покривала за каски за американски футбол; Стикери за каски за американски футбол; Крепежи и резервни части за каски за американски футбол; Подплата за каска за американски футбол; Крепежни елементи за визьори на каски за американски футбол; Визьори за каска за американски футбол
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Fotbal american > Echipament de protecție pentru fotbal american > Accesorii pentru căști de fotbal american: Accesorii și componente pentru cureaua de bărbie a căștii de fotbal american; Bretele pentru bărbie pentru fotbal american; Măști de față pentru fotbal american; Huse pentru căști de fotbal american; Autocolante pentru căști de fotbal american; Componente și piese de schimb pentru căști de fotbal american; Inserții pentru căști de fotbal american; Accesorii de prindere pentru viziera căștii de fotbal american; Viziere pentru căști de fotbal american